Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.050

"Advanced registered nursing practice" defined—Exceptions. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

"Advanced registered nursing practice" means the performance of the acts of a registered nurse and the performance of an expanded role in providing health care services as recognized by the medical and nursing professions, the scope of which is defined by rule by the *commission. Upon approval by the *commission, an advanced registered nurse practitioner may prescribe legend drugs and controlled substances contained in Schedule V of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW, and Schedules II through IV subject to RCW 18.79.240(1) (r) or (s).

Nothing in this section prohibits a person from practicing a profession for which a license has been issued under the laws of this state or specifically authorized by any other law of the state of Washington.

This section does not prohibit (1) the nursing care of the sick, without compensation, by an unlicensed person who does not hold himself or herself out to be an advanced registered nurse practitioner, or (2) the practice of registered nursing by a licensed registered nurse or the practice of licensed practical nursing by a licensed practical nurse.

[2000 c 64 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 405.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Effective date—2000 c 64 ss 1-3: "Sections 1 through 3 of this act take effect July 1, 2000." [2000 c 64 s 8.]

Severability—2000 c 64: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [2000 c 64 s 9.]

PDFRCW 18.79.050

"Advanced practice registered nursing" defined—Exceptions. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

"Advanced practice registered nursing" means the performance of the acts of a registered nurse and the performance of an expanded role in providing health care services as recognized by the medical and nursing professions, the scope of which is defined by rule by the board. Upon approval by the board, an advanced practice registered nurse may prescribe legend drugs and controlled substances contained in Schedule V of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW, and Schedules II through IV subject to RCW 18.79.240(1) (r) or (s).

Nothing in this section prohibits a person from practicing a profession for which a license has been issued under the laws of this state or specifically authorized by any other law of the state of Washington.

This section does not prohibit (1) the nursing care of the sick, without compensation, by an unlicensed person who does not hold himself or herself out to be an advanced practice registered nurse, or (2) the practice of registered nursing by a licensed registered nurse or the practice of licensed practical nursing by a licensed practical nurse.

[2024 c 239 s 3; 2000 c 64 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 405.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.

Effective date—2000 c 64 ss 1-3: "Sections 1 through 3 of this act take effect July 1, 2000." [2000 c 64 s 8.]

Severability—2000 c 64: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [2000 c 64 s 9.]